Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Nominations

§ 22-22-201.
Eligibility for office.

A qualified elector resident in a school district is eligible to hold the office of school district trustee in the school district, but only from the trustee residence area in which he resides if the district is divided into residence areas.

A qualified elector resident in a community college district may be elected to the district board of the community college district, but only from the subdistrict in which he resides if the district is divided into subdistricts.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-299.

Cross references. —

As to elector qualifications, see §

22-3-102

.

Section does not purport to eliminate or restrict rule against holding incompatible offices.

Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Employment as teacher and office as member of board of trustees of school district are incompatible

within the meaning and intent of the common-law rule that a person cannot hold incompatible offices or positions. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

For person to hold office as trustee while acting as teacher would deprive the citizens of the school district of the independent judgment of a full and impartial board of trustees elected to represent the entire public interest. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

A party who obtained office as a member of the school district's board of trustees while a teacher in that district and who sought to retain both positions was precluded by rule of incompatibility which operated to vacate party's office as trustee rather than position as school teacher. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

§ 22-22-202.
Filing of application; form.

A qualified elector may be nominated for the office of school district trustee or member of a community college board by filing an application for election in the office of the county clerk not more than ninety (90) nor less than seventy (70) days prior to the election. The application shall be in substantially the following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTION FOR SCHOOL ORCOMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEE I, the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on , (year), and that I have been a resident of the State of Wyoming since , and that I am a registered voter of the school district or community college district (and resident of trustee residence area or subdistrict , if any), residing at , and I do hereby request that my name, , be printed on the ballot of the election to be held on the day of , (year), as a candidate for the office of for a term of years. I hereby declare that if I am elected, I will qualify for the office. Dated: (Signature of Candidate) Name as it is to appear on the ballot

Click to view

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 80, § 2.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-300; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1979, ch. 133, § 2; 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1983, ch. 80, § 2; 1988, ch. 24, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 47, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), deleted “ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Residence Address)” from the end of the form.

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-22-203.
Determining validity of application; placement on ballot; procedure for multi-county districts.

The county clerk receiving a nomination application shall determine whether the person seeking nomination is a qualified candidate. If the application is sufficient in all respects, the name of the person nominated shall appear on the official ballot for the election specified in the application. In the case of a school or community college district which crosses county boundaries, the clerk of the county in which a valid application is filed shall certify the name of the person nominated to the clerk of the other county or counties involved for placement on the official ballot for the election specified in the application.

Each county clerk in each election involving a school or community college district which crosses county boundaries shall determine whether voting machines, electronic voting system, paper ballots, or a combination thereof, shall be used to insure that each qualified elector votes only for the candidate or candidates from the school district and trustee residence area, if any, and from the community college district and subdistrict, if any, for which he is entitled to vote.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-301; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2.